src/acro-fao-lex.txt
! ========= !
! Akronymer !
! ========= !

LEXICON Acronyms

Akronymnumeralier ; ! Nogle tal först, måskje

FIRSTLETTER ;  ! Dynamically generated acronyms, 	!^C^ Remove these from nonrec?
               ! between two and four letters long.
LETTERNUMBER ; ! Listed (still not monitored)		!^C^
               ! Perhaps we should allow for a final arabic number at
               ! the end of the acronyms, the NRK and NRK2 pattern.
SOMELONGACRO ; ! Here, we collect some long acronyms, perhaps we should  !^C^
               ! open for dynamic generation of longer acronyms, if this 
               ! list gets long.
smallacro ;    ! This is a pointer to a lexicon of manually listed small-letter
               ! acronyms. They are not generated, since it would interfer with the
               ! ordinary transducer, but listed here, as they then can point to the
               ! same ACRO lexicon as the generated capital-letter acronyms.


LEXICON Akronymnumeralier
%0 anl ; 1 anl ; 2 anl ; 3 anl ; 4 anl ; 5 anl ; 6 anl ; 7 anl ; 8 anl ; 9 anl ; 

LEXICON anl ! akronymloop
     Akronymnumeralier ; ! loop
     FIRSTLETTER ;       ! Over til bogstaverne
 :%- FIRSTLETTER ;       ! ... med stræg først


LEXICON FIRSTLETTER	!^C^
B SCND ; C SCND ; D  SCND ; F  SCND ; G  SCND ; 	!^C^
H SCND ; J SCND ; K  SCND ; L  SCND ; M  SCND ; N  SCND ; !^C^
P SCND ; Q SCND ; R SCND ; S  SCND ; T  SCND ; V  SCND ; 	!^C^
W SCND ; X SCND ; Z  SCND ; 								!^C^
A SCND ; E  SCND ; I  SCND ; O  SCND ; U  SCND ; 			!^C^
Æ SCND ; Ø SCND ; Y  SCND ; Ä  SCND ; Ö  SCND ; Å  SCND ; 			!^C^
Á SCND ; É SCND ; Í SCND ; Ó SCND ; Ú SCND ; Ý SCND ; Þ SCND ; Ð SCND ;	!^C^

LEXICON SCND		!^C^
B THRD ; C THRD ; D THRD ; F THRD ; G THRD ; 	!^C^
H THRD ; J THRD ; K THRD ; L THRD ; M THRD ; N THRD ; !^C^
P THRD ; Q THRD ; R THRD ; S THRD ; T THRD ; V THRD ; 	!^C^
W THRD ; X THRD ; Z THRD ; 								!^C^
A THRD ; Á THRD ; E THRD ; I THRD ; O THRD ; U THRD ; 			!^C^
Æ THRD ; Ø THRD ; Y THRD ; Ä THRD ; Ö THRD ; Å THRD ; 			!^C^
Á THRD ; É THRD ; Í THRD ; Ó THRD ; Ú THRD ; Ý THRD ; Þ THRD ; Ð THRD ;	!^C^
%- ARABIC ; ARABIC ; !^C^ ! N-9520 Kárášjohka

LEXICON THRD			!^C^
B FRTH ; C FRTH ; D  FRTH ; F  FRTH ; G  FRTH ; 	!^C^
H FRTH ; J FRTH ; K  FRTH ; L  FRTH ; M  FRTH ; N  FRTH ; 	!^C^
P FRTH ; Q FRTH ; R FRTH ; S  FRTH ; T  FRTH ; V  FRTH ; 	!^C^
W FRTH ; X FRTH ; Z  FRTH ; Ž FRTH ; 								!^C^
A FRTH ; Á FRTH ; E  FRTH ; I  FRTH ; O  FRTH ; U  FRTH ; 			!^C^
Æ FRTH ; Ø FRTH ; Y  FRTH ; Ä  FRTH ; Ö  FRTH ; Å  FRTH ; 			!^C^
Á FRTH ; É FRTH ; Í FRTH ; Ó FRTH ; Ú FRTH ; Ý FRTH ; Þ FRTH ; Ð FRTH ;	!^C^
  ACRO ;
				!^C^

LEXICON FRTH			!^C^
B FFTH ; C FFTH ; D  FFTH ; F  FFTH ; G  FFTH ; 	!^C^
H FFTH ; J FFTH ; K  FFTH ; L  FFTH ; M  FFTH ; N  FFTH ;  	!^C^
P FFTH ; Q FFTH ; R FFTH ; S  FFTH ; T  FFTH ;  V  FFTH ; 	!^C^
W FFTH ; X FFTH ; Z  FFTH ; 								!^C^
A FFTH ; Á FFTH ; E  FFTH ; I  FFTH ; O  FFTH ; U  FFTH ; 			!^C^
Æ FFTH ; Ø FFTH ; Y  FFTH ; Ä  FFTH ; Ö  FFTH ; Å  FFTH  ; 			!^C^
Á FFTH ; É FFTH ; Í FFTH ; Ó FFTH ; Ú FFTH ; Ý FFTH ; Þ FFTH ; Ð FFTH ;	!^C^
ACRO ;				!^C^
! # ; !To prevent cases like :as, `as and as. But this gives tagless 3-letter ACR.


LEXICON FFTH			!^C^
B ACRO ; C ACRO ; D  ACRO ; F  ACRO ; G  ACRO ; 	!^C^
H ACRO ; J ACRO ; K  ACRO ; L  ACRO ; M  ACRO ; N  ACRO ;  	!^C^
P ACRO ; Q ACRO ; R ACRO ; S  ACRO ; T  ACRO ;  V  ACRO ; 	!^C^
W ACRO ; X ACRO ; Z  ACRO ; 								!^C^
A ACRO ; Á ACRO ; E  ACRO ; I  ACRO ; O  ACRO ; U  ACRO ; 			!^C^
Æ ACRO ; Ø ACRO ; Y  ACRO ; Ä  ACRO ; Ö  ACRO ; Å  ACRO  ; 			!^C^
Á ACRO ; É ACRO ; Í ACRO ; Ó ACRO ; Ú ACRO ; Ý ACRO ; Þ ACRO ; Ð ACRO ;	!^C^
ACRO ;
			!^C^


LEXICON LETTERNUMBER 
A/S ACRO ;
a/s ACRO ;
O97S ACRO ;
Bb ACRO ;
Jk1 ACRO ;
NRK1 ACRO ;
NRK2 ACRO ;
TV2 ACRO ;
E6 ACRO ;
L-97 ACRO ;
LA21 ACRO ;
O-97 ACRO ;
P1 ACRO ; 
P2 ACRO ; 
P3 ACRO ; 
P4 ACRO ; 
P-1 ACRO ; 
P-2 ACRO ; 
P-3 ACRO ; 
P-4 ACRO ; 
Q-2 ACRO ;
StÍF ACRO ;
T5PC ACRO ;
! Here, we need a good regex for
! letter - number combination.

LEXICON SOMELONGACRO		!^C^
EXFACFON ACRO ;			!^C^
EXFACHS ACRO ;			!^C^
NAMMCO ACRO ;
KANUKOKA ACRO ;
NASCO ACRO ;
NSR-N ACRO ;

LEXICON smallacro
as ACRO ; !A/S
cd ACRO ;
tv ACRO ;

LEXICON ACRO               
%-      ARABIC ;           ! Here we dive over to the numerals, 
        ARABIC ;           ! Here we dive over to the numerals
+N+ACR: acroconnector ;    ! Here we add the POS tag and go ACRO
%-      R- ;

LEXICON acroconnector  
:%- acrocase ;             
:%' acrocase ;             
:   acrocase ;

LEXICON acrocase
+Nom: # ;
+Acc: # ;
+Dat: # ;
+Gen:%>s # ;
